Utah statutes.
20A-1-707.   Transition clause.

Any petition that is filed or pending under this part on or after March 1, 2013, shall be subject to the provisions of this part, including any amendments to this part made by Senate Bill 289, passed in the 2013 General Session.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 2013 General Session

